Wyoming statutes. Title 32 Notaries Public
Chapter 1 Notaries Public

Cross references. —

For authority of notaries public to administer oath, see §

1-2-102

.

As to falsely certifying that person was sworn or affirmed, see §

6-5-108

.

As to false certificate of acknowledgment, see §

6-5-114

.

As to fee for issuing commission to notary public by secretary of state, see §

9-1-305

.

As to execution of leases before notary public in connection with sale of state land, see §

36-9-106

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

58 Am. Jur. 2d Notaries Public § 1 et seq.

Measure of damages for false or incomplete certificate by notary public or similar officer, 13 ALR3d 1039.

Proximate results of wrongful acts of notary public, 44 ALR3d 555, 44 ALR3d 760, 44 ALR3d 1243.

66 C.J.S. Notaries § 1 et seq.

§ 32-1-101.
Qualifications; application; term. [Repealed]

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 88, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1661; Laws 1895, ch. 56, § 1; 1897, ch. 47; R.S. 1899, § 2597; C.S. 1910, § 3562; C.S. 1920, § 4503; R.S. 1931, § 75-101; Laws 1937, ch. 33, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 43-201; W.S. 1957, § 32-1; Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 2; 1987, ch. 47, § 1; 1993, ch. 1, § 1; repealed by 2021 ch. 27, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 32-1-102.
Name changes. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 31, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 75-102; C.S. 1945, § 43-202; W.S. 1957, § 32-2; Laws 1973, ch. 37, § 1; 1981, ch. 47, § 1; 1987, ch. 47, § 1; repealed by 2021 ch. 27, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 32-1-103.
Transmittal of notarial commission to county clerks. [Repealed]

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 88, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 1662; R.S. 1899, § 2598; C.S. 1910, § 3563; Laws 1917, ch. 101, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 4504; R.S. 1931, § 75-103; C.S. 1945, § 43-203; W.S. 1957, § 32-3; Laws 1987, ch. 47, § 1; repealed by 2021 ch. 27, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 32-1-104.
Bond and oath; notary commission forfeited upon failure to obtain another bond. [Repealed]

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 88, § 3; Laws 1884, ch. 61, § 1; 1888, ch. 20, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 2599; C.S. 1910, § 3564; C.S. 1920, § 4505; R.S. 1931, § 75-104; C.S. 1945, § 43-204; W.S. 1957, § 32-4; Laws 1987, ch. 47, § 1; 1989, ch. 97, § 1; repealed by 2021 ch. 27, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 32-1-105.
Powers and jurisdiction. [Repealed]

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 88, § 5; R.S. 1887, § 1666; R.S. 1899, § 2601; C.S. 1910, § 3566; Laws 1917, ch. 6, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 4507; R.S. 1931, § 75-106; C.S. 1945, § 43-206; W.S. 1957, § 32-5; Laws 1987, ch. 47, § 1; 1993, ch. 5, § 1; 1997, ch. 29, § 1; 2011, ch. 113, §§ 2, 3; repealed by 2021 ch. 27, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 32-1-106.
Official seal. [Repealed]

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 88, § 4; R.S. 1887, § 1665; R.S. 1899, § 2600; C.S. 1910, § 3565; C.S. 1920, § 4506; R.S. 1931, § 75-105; C.S. 1945, § 43-205; W.S. 1957, § 32-6; Laws 1967, ch. 189, § 1; 1973, ch. 4, § 1; repealed by 2021 ch. 27, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 32-1-107.
Notary's certificate as presumptive evidence. [Repealed]

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 88, § 6; R.S. 1887, § 1667; R.S. 1899, § 2602; C.S. 1910, § 3567; C.S. 1920, § 4508; R.S. 1931, § 75-107; C.S. 1945, § 43-207; W.S. 1957, § 32-9; repealed by 2021 ch. 27, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 32-1-108.
Action on notarial bond. [Repealed]

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 88, § 8; R.S. 1887, § 1669; R.S. 1899, § 2604; C.S. 1910, § 3569; C.S. 1920, § 4510; R.S. 1931, § 75-109; C.S. 1945, § 43-209; W.S. 1957, § 32-10; repealed by 2021 ch. 27, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 32-1-109.
Notary acting after term expires. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 73, § 113; R.S. 1899, § 5084; C.S. 1910, § 5935; C.S. 1920, § 7224; R.S. 1931, § 32-615; C.S. 1945, § 9-616; W.S. 1957, § 32-11; repealed by 2021 ch. 27, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 32-1-110.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 113, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from C.L. 1876, ch. 88, § 10, related to failure of county clerk to perform duties imposed by chapter.

Laws 2011, ch. 113, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 32-1-111.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 113, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from C.L. 1876, ch. 88, § 15, related to when court may protest paper in lieu of notary.

Laws 2011, ch. 113, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 32-1-112.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 113, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1882, ch. 45, § 12, related to fees.

Laws 2011, ch. 113, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 32-1-113.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 113, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1909, ch. 142, § 1, related to notary's interest in bank not disqualifying.

Laws 2011, ch. 113, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 32-1-114.
Certificate of authentication. [Repealed]

History.

2017 ch. 40, § 1, effective February 17, 2017; repealed by 2021 ch. 27, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.